New York, session 2025-2026, A573.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (iii) of subdivision (a) of section 262 of the 2 family court act, as amended by chapter 666 of the laws of 1976, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (iii) the petitioner and the respondent in any proceeding under part 5 three of article six of this act; 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02787-01-5